dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX b2 cer cat/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b2 er assions/n'q'l't' [^c]er
SFX b2 cer cassions/n'q'l't' cer
SFX b2 er assiez/n'q'l'm' [^c]er
SFX b2 cer cassiez/n'q'l'm' cer
SFX b2 er assent/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b2 cer cassent/n'q'l'm't's' cer

SFX b3 Y 242
SFX b3 er er/m't's' er
SFX b3 er ant/m't's' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cant/m't's' cer
SFX b3 er e er
SFX b3 ecer ece/m' ecer
SFX b3 emer eme/m' emer
SFX b3 ener ene/m' ener
SFX b3 eper epe/m' eper
SFX b3 erer ere/m' erer
SFX b3 eser ese/m' eser
SFX b3 ever eve/m' ever
SFX b3 evrer evre/m' evrer
SFX b3 eter ete/m' eter
SFX b3 eler ele/m' eler
SFX b3 ecer eces/t' ecer
SFX b3 emer emes/t' emer
SFX b3 ener enes/t' ener
SFX b3 eper epes/t' eper
SFX b3 erer eres/t' erer
SFX b3 eser eses/t' eser
SFX b3 ever eves/t' ever
SFX b3 evrer evres/t' evrer
SFX b3 eter etes/t' eter
SFX b3 eler eles/t' eler
SFX b3 ecer ece/s' ecer
SFX b3 emer eme/s' emer
SFX b3 ener ene/s' ener
SFX b3 eper epe/s' eper
SFX b3 erer ere/s' erer
SFX b3 eser ese/s' eser
SFX b3 ever eve/s' ever
SFX b3 evrer evre/s' evrer
SFX b3 eter ete/s' eter
SFX b3 eler ele/s' eler
SFX b3 er ons [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cons cer
SFX b3 er ez er
SFX b3 ecer ecent/s' ecer
SFX b3 emer ement/s' emer
SFX b3 ener enent/s' ener
SFX b3 eper epent/s' eper
SFX b3 erer erent/s' erer
SFX b3 eser esent/s' eser
SFX b3 ever event/s' ever
SFX b3 evrer evrent/s' evrer
SFX b3 eter etent/s' eter
SFX b3 eler elent/s' eler
SFX b3 er ais/m' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cais/m' cer
SFX b3 er ais/t' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cais/t' cer
SFX b3 er ait/s' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cait/s' cer
SFX b3 er ions er
SFX b3 er iez er
SFX b3 er aient/s' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer caient/s' cer
SFX b3 er ai/m' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cai/m' cer
SFX b3 er as/t' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cas/t' cer
SFX b3 er a/s' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer ca/s' cer
SFX b3 er ames [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cames cer
SFX b3 er ates [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cates cer
SFX b3 er erent/s' er
SFX b3 ecer ecerai/m' ecer
SFX b3 emer emerai/m' emer
SFX b3 ener enerai/m' ener
SFX b3 eper eperai/m' eper
SFX b3 erer ererai/m' erer
SFX b3 eser eserai/m' eser
SFX b3 ever everai/m' ever
SFX b3 evrer evrerai/m' evrer
SFX b3 eter eterai/m' eter
SFX b3 eler elerai/m' eler
SFX b3 ecer eceras/t' ecer
SFX b3 emer emeras/t' emer
SFX b3 ener eneras/t' ener
SFX b3 eper eperas/t' eper
SFX b3 erer ereras/t' erer
SFX b3 eser eseras/t' eser
SFX b3 ever everas/t' ever
SFX b3 evrer evreras/t' evrer
SFX b3 eter eteras/t' eter
SFX b3 eler eleras/t' eler
SFX b3 ecer ecera/s' ecer
SFX b3 emer emera/s' emer
SFX b3 ener enera/s' ener
SFX b3 eper epera/s' eper
SFX b3 erer erera/s' erer
SFX b3 eser esera/s' eser
SFX b3 ever evera/s' ever
SFX b3 evrer evrera/s' evrer
SFX b3 eter etera/s' eter
SFX b3 eler elera/s' eler
SFX b3 ecer ecerons ecer
SFX b3 emer emerons emer
SFX b3 ener enerons ener
SFX b3 eper eperons eper
SFX b3 erer ererons erer
SFX b3 eser eserons eser
SFX b3 ever everons ever
SFX b3 evrer evrerons evrer
SFX b3 eter eterons eter
SFX b3 eler elerons eler
SFX b3 ecer ecerez ecer
SFX b3 emer emerez emer
SFX b3 ener enerez ener
SFX b3 eper eperez eper
SFX b3 erer ererez erer
SFX b3 eser eserez eser
SFX b3 ever everez ever
SFX b3 evrer evrerez evrer
SFX b3 eter eterez eter
SFX b3 eler elerez eler
SFX b3 ecer eceront/s' ecer
SFX b3 emer emeront/s' emer
SFX b3 ener eneront/s' ener
SFX b3 eper eperont/s' eper
SFX b3 erer ereront/s' erer
SFX b3 eser eseront/s' eser
SFX b3 ever everont/s' ever
SFX b3 evrer evreront/s' evrer
SFX b3 eter eteront/s' eter
SFX b3 eler eleront/s' eler
SFX b3 ecer ecerais/m' ecer
SFX b3 emer emerais/m' emer
SFX b3 ener enerais/m' ener
SFX b3 eper eperais/m' eper
SFX b3 erer ererais/m' erer
SFX b3 eser eserais/m' eser
SFX b3 ever everais/m' ever
SFX b3 evrer evrerais/m' evrer
SFX b3 eter eterais/m' eter
SFX b3 eler elerais/m' eler
SFX b3 ecer ecerais/t' ecer
SFX b3 emer emerais/t' emer
SFX b3 ener enerais/t' ener
SFX b3 eper eperais/t' eper
SFX b3 erer ererais/t' erer
SFX b3 eser eserais/t' eser
SFX b3 ever everais/t' ever
SFX b3 evrer evrerais/t' evrer
SFX b3 eter eterais/t' eter
SFX b3 eler elerais/t' eler
SFX b3 ecer ecerait/s' ecer
SFX b3 emer emerait/s' emer
SFX b3 ener enerait/s' ener
SFX b3 eper eperait/s' eper
SFX b3 erer ererait/s' erer
SFX b3 eser eserait/s' eser
SFX b3 ever everait/s' ever
SFX b3 evrer evrerait/s' evrer
SFX b3 eter eterait/s' eter
SFX b3 eler elerait/s' eler
SFX b3 ecer ecerions ecer
SFX b3 emer emerions emer
SFX b3 ener enerions ener
SFX b3 eper eperions eper
SFX b3 erer ererions erer
SFX b3 eser eserions eser
SFX b3 ever everions ever
SFX b3 evrer evrerions evrer
SFX b3 eter eterions eter
SFX b3 eler elerions eler
SFX b3 ecer eceriez ecer
SFX b3 emer emeriez emer
SFX b3 ener eneriez ener
SFX b3 eper eperiez eper
SFX b3 erer ereriez erer
SFX b3 eser eseriez eser
SFX b3 ever everiez ever
SFX b3 evrer evreriez evrer
SFX b3 eter eteriez eter
SFX b3 eler eleriez eler
SFX b3 ecer eceraient/s' ecer
SFX b3 emer emeraient/s' emer
SFX b3 ener eneraient/s' ener
SFX b3 eper eperaient/s' eper
SFX b3 erer ereraient/s' erer
SFX b3 eser eseraient/s' eser
SFX b3 ever everaient/s' ever
SFX b3 evrer evreraient/s' evrer
SFX b3 eter eteraient/s' eter
SFX b3 eler eleraient/s' eler
SFX b3 ecer ece/m' ecer
SFX b3 emer eme/m' emer
SFX b3 ener ene/m' ener
SFX b3 eper epe/m' eper
SFX b3 erer ere/m' erer
SFX b3 eser ese/m' eser
SFX b3 ever eve/m' ever
SFX b3 evrer evre/m' evrer
SFX b3 eter ete/m' eter
SFX b3 eler ele/m' eler
SFX b3 ecer eces/t' ecer
SFX b3 emer emes/t' emer
SFX b3 ener enes/t' ener
SFX b3 eper epes/t' eper
SFX b3 erer eres/t' erer
SFX b3 eser eses/t' eser
SFX b3 ever eves/t' ever
SFX b3 evrer evres/t' evrer
SFX b3 eter etes/t' eter
SFX b3 eler eles/t' eler
SFX b3 ecer ece/s' ecer
SFX b3 emer eme/s' emer
SFX b3 ener ene/s' ener
SFX b3 eper epe/s' eper
SFX b3 erer ere/s' erer
SFX b3 eser ese/s' eser
SFX b3 ever eve/s' ever
SFX b3 evrer evre/s' evrer
SFX b3 eter ete/s' eter
SFX b3 eler ele/s' eler
SFX b3 er ions er
SFX b3 er iez er
SFX b3 ecer ecent/s' ecer
SFX b3 emer ement/s' emer
SFX b3 ener enent/s' ener
SFX b3 eper epent/s' eper
SFX b3 erer erent/s' erer
SFX b3 eser esent/s' eser
SFX b3 ever event/s' ever
SFX b3 evrer evrent/s' evrer
SFX b3 eter etent/s' eter
SFX b3 eler elent/s' eler
SFX b3 er asse/m' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer casse/m' cer
SFX b3 er asses/t' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer casses/t' cer
SFX b3 er at/s' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cat/s' cer
SFX b3 er assions [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cassions cer
SFX b3 er assiez [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cassiez cer
SFX b3 er assent/s' [^c]er
SFX b3 cer cassent/s' cer
